Indiana, session 2026, SB220.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 27-1-47-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. An incentive offered in accordance with
IC 27-1-48.7 is not a violation of IC 27-1-20-30, IC 27-1-22-18, or
IC 27-4-1-4(a)(8).
SECTION 2. IC 27-1-48.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 48.7. Shopping and Decision Support Program
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to a health plan that is entered into,
amended, or renewed after December 31, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "allowed amount" means the
contractually agreed upon payment amount between a health
carrier and a provider participating in the health carrier's
network. The term does not include any deductible, copayment, or
other cost sharing amounts that a health carrier requires a covered
individual to pay.
SB 220—LS 6900/DI 141


Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "covered individual" means an
individual entitled to coverage under a health plan.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "health care service" means a
health care procedure, treatment, or service provided by a
provider within the scope of practice of the provider's license or
legal authorization. The term includes the following:
(1) Physical and occupational therapy services.
(2) Radiology and imaging services.
(3) Laboratory services.
(4) Infusion therapy.
(b) The term does not include the following:
(1) Dental services.
(2) Vision services.
(3) Cosmetic surgery.
Sec. 5. (a) As used in this chapter, "health carrier" means an
entity:
(1) that is subject to IC 27 and the administrative rules
adopted under IC 27; and
(2) that enters into a contract to:
(A) provide health care services;
(B) deliver health care services;
(C) arrange for health care services; or
(D) pay for or reimburse any of the costs of health care
services.
(b) The term includes the following:
(1) An insurer, as defined in IC 27-1-2-3(x), that issues a
policy of accident and sickness insurance, as defined in
IC 27-8-5-1(a).
(2) A health maintenance organization, as defined in
IC 27-13-1-19.
(3) An administrator (as defined in IC 27-1-25-1(a)) that is
licensed under IC 27-1-25.
(4) A state employee health plan offered under IC 5-10-8.
(5) A short term insurance plan (as defined by IC 27-8-5.9-3).
(6) Any other entity that provides a plan of health insurance,
health benefits, or health care services.
(c) The term does not include:
(1) an insurer that issues a policy of accident and sickness
insurance;
(2) a limited service health maintenance organization (as
defined in IC 27-13-34-4); or
(3) an administrator;
SB 220—LS 6900/DI 141


that only provides coverage for, or processes claims for, dental or
vision care services.
Sec. 6. (a) As used in this chapter, "health plan" means a policy
or contract offered by a health carrier in this state that provides
coverage for health care services.
(b) The term does not include a self-funded health benefit plan
that complies with the federal Employee Retirement Income
Security Act (ERISA) of 1974 (29 U.S.C. 1001 et seq.).
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "network" means a group of
providers that:
(1) provide health care services to covered individuals; and
(2) have agreed to, or are otherwise subject to, maximum
limits on the prices for the health care services to be provided
to the covered individuals.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "provider" means an individual
or entity licensed or legally authorized to provide health care
services.
Sec. 9. As used in this chapter, "shopping and decision support
program" means the program established by a health carrier
under this chapter.
Sec. 10. (a) Beginning January 1, 2028, a health carrier shall:
(1) implement a shopping and decision support program that:
(A) is available as a component of each health plan offered
by the health carrier; and
(B) provides shopping capabilities and decision support
services for covered individuals in the health plan; and
(2) provide incentives for covered individuals in a health plan
who elect to receive a comparable health care service from a
network provider that is paid less than the average allowed
amount paid by the health carrier to network providers for
the comparable health care service before and after a covered
individual's out-of-pocket limit has been met.
(b) Incentives provided under this section must be:
(1) calculated as a percentage of the difference between the
amount actually paid by the health carrier for the comparable
health care service and the average allowed amount for the
comparable health care service; and
(2) provided as a:
(A) cash payment to the covered individual;
(B) credit toward the covered individual's annual
deductible and out-of-pocket limit; or
(C) credit or reduction of a premium, a copayment, cost
SB 220—LS 6900/DI 141


sharing, or a deductible.
(c) The shopping and decision support program shall provide
each covered individual with at least fifty percent (50%) of the
health carrier's saved costs for each comparable health care
service. However, the shopping and decision support program may
exclude incentive payments, credits, or reductions for services if
the savings to the health carrier is fifty dollars ($50) or less.
(d) The average allowed amount must be based on the actual
allowed amounts paid to network providers under the covered
individual's health plan within a reasonable time frame not to
exceed one (1) year.
Sec. 11. (a) Beginning December 1, 2027, a health carrier shall
make available an interactive member portal that enables a
covered individual to request and obtain from the health carrier
information on:
(1) out-of-pocket costs applicable to the covered individual for
comparable health care services;
(2) average payments made by the health carrier to network
providers for comparable health care services; and
(3) quality data for network providers, to the extent available.
(b) A health carrier may make available a toll free telephone
number that enables a covered individual to request and obtain the
information described in subsection (a).
(c) A health carrier may contract with a third party vendor to
comply with this section.
Sec. 12. (a) Beginning January 1, 2028, a health carrier shall
annually provide notice to covered individuals of at least the
following information:
(1) That the covered individual has a right to obtain
information through an interactive member portal or a toll
free telephone number in accordance with section 11 of this
chapter.
(2) The process for obtaining information through an
interactive member portal or toll free telephone number.
(3) A description of how to earn incentives provided under
section 10 of this chapter.
(b) A health carrier shall provide the notice required under this
section on the health carrier's website and in the health plan
material provided to covered individuals.
Sec. 13. (a) Before offering the shopping and decision support
program to a covered individual, a health carrier must file a
description of the shopping and decision support program with the
SB 220—LS 6900/DI 141


department.
(b) A health carrier:
(1) has discretion as to the appropriate format for providing
the description required under subsection (a); and
(2) may customize the format to provide the most relevant
information necessary to permit the department to determine
compliance with this chapter.
(c) The department may review the filing made by the health
carrier to determine if the health carrier's shopping and decision
support program complies with this chapter.
Sec. 14. (a) Beginning January 1, 2029, a health carrier shall
annually file with the department for the most recent calendar year
the:
(1) total number of comparable health care service incentive
payments made to covered individuals;
(2) use of comparable health care services by category of
service for which comparable health care service incentive
payments were made;
(3) average amount of incentive payments made by
comparable health care service for the transactions; and
(4) percentage of a health carrier's covered individuals that
participated in the transactions.
The commissioner may set reasonable limits on the annual
reporting requirements for health carriers under this subsection to
focus on the more popular comparable health care services.
(b) Not later than April 1, 2029, and April 1 of each year
thereafter, the department shall submit an aggregate report
regarding the information received from health carriers under
subsection (a) to the standing committees of the house of
representatives and the senate that consider insurance matters.
Sec. 15. The commissioner may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
SECTION 3. IC 27-2-25-13, AS ADDED BY P.L.93-2020,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. A health carrier may provide a good faith
estimate to an individual under this chapter:
(1) in a writing delivered to the individual;
(2) by electronic mail; or
(3) through an interactive member portal or a toll free
telephone number in accordance with IC 27-1-48.7-11; or
(3) (4) through a mobile application or other Internet web based
method, if available;
SB 220—LS 6900/DI 141


according to the preference expressed by the individual.
SB 220—LS 6900/DI 141


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Health and Provider
Services, to which was referred Senate Bill No. 220, has had the same
under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill DO PASS.
(Reference is to SB 220 as introduced.)
CHARBONNEAU, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 11, Nays 0
_____
SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Senate Bill 220 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 1, between the enacting clause and line 1, begin a new
paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 27-1-47-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. An incentive offered in
accordance with IC 27-1-48.7 is not a violation of IC 27-1-20-30,
IC 27-1-22-18, or IC 27-4-1-4(a)(8).".
Page 2, delete lines 40 through 42, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"Sec. 6. (a) As used in this chapter, "health plan" means a policy
or contract offered by a health carrier in this state that provides
coverage for health care services.
(b) The term does not include a self-funded health benefit plan
that complies with the federal Employee Retirement Income
Security Act (ERISA) of 1974 (29 U.S.C. 1001 et seq.).".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
(Reference is to SB 220 as printed January 23, 2026.)
CHARBONNEAU
SB 220—LS 6900/DI 141